Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 13.2 Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act

34-13.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 113, § 1.

34-13.2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Document” means information that is:

Inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form; and

Eligible to be recorded in the land records maintained by the recorder of deeds.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic document” means a document that is received by the recorder of deeds in an electronic form.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document.

“Jurisdiction” means any municipality, city, or town incorporated in the state of Rhode Island.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited-liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Recorder of deeds” means the officer who has authority under state law to accept documents for recording in the land records office. This could include such officers as the “registrar”, “clerk”, and/or the “recorder”.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 113, § 1.

34-13.2-3.
Validity of electronic documents.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be an original, be on paper or another tangible medium, or be in writing, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic document satisfying this chapter.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be signed, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic signature.

A requirement that a document or a signature associated with a document be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed, or made under oath is satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized to perform that act, and all other information required to be included, is attached to or logically associated with the document or signature. A physical or electronic image of a stamp, impression, or seal need not accompany an electronic signature.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 113, § 1.

34-13.2-4.
Recording of documents.

In this section, “paper document” means a document that is received by the recorder of deeds in a form that is not electronic.

A recorder of deeds:

Who implements any of the functions listed in this section shall do so in compliance with the most recent standards and best practices.

May receive, index, store, archive, and transmit electronic documents.

May provide for access to, and for search and retrieval of, documents and information by electronic means.

Who accepts electronic documents for recording shall continue to accept paper documents as authorized by state law and shall place entries for both types of documents in the same index.

May convert paper documents accepted for recording into electronic form.

May convert into electronic form information recorded before the recorder of deeds began to record electronic documents.

May accept electronically any fee or tax that the recorder of deeds is authorized to collect pursuant to §

34-13-7

.

May agree with other officials of other cities or towns within the state on procedures or processes to facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals and conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of fees and taxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 113, § 1.

34-13.2-5.
Administration and standards.

To keep the standards and practices of recorder of deeds in this state in harmony with other jurisdictions in this state, the recorder of deeds, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this chapter, in adopting, amending, and repealing standards, shall consider the following:

Standards and practices of other jurisdictions;

Best practices that are accepted or prescribed as being correct or most effective;

The views of interested persons and governmental officials and entities;

The needs of municipalities of varying size, population, and resources; and

Standards requiring adequate information security protection to ensure that electronic documents are accurate, authentic, adequately preserved, and resistant to tampering.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 113, § 1.

34-13.2-6.
Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that chapter (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 113, § 1.